hw2/eng_plural.foma
### eng_plural.foma ###

define IrregularNounPlural;

define Vowel [ a | i | e | o | u | y ] ;
define Consonant [ b | c | d  | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | z] ;
define Letter [ Vowel | Consonant ] ;
define Word [ Letter ]+ ;
define NounMark "+N" ;
define NounNumber "+Sg" | "+Pl" ;
define Noun Word NounMark NounNumber ;

define NounAffixation "+N" + "+Sg" -> "" || _ .#., "+N" "+Pl" -> "!" s || _ .#. ;
define Sibilant [ x | s | z | c h | s h ];
define SibException [ Letter ]+ a r c h "!" s ;
define eInsertion [..] -> e || Sibilant _ "!" s .#.;
define checkSibilant [ sibException .P. eInsertion ];
define yReplacement y -> i e || Consonant _ "!" s .#.;
define Cleanup "!" -> "" || _ ;
define RegularNoun [ NounAffixation .o. yReplacement .o. checkSibilant .o. Cleanup ] ;
define Grammar Noun .o. [ IrregularNounPlural .P. RegularNoun ] ;

push Grammar

save stack eng_plural.bin
